Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:(1) No person or organization may use an institution of higher education's campus to camp, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.(2) An individual or organization wishing to establish an encampment on an institution of higher education's campus shall notify the institution 21 days prior to the establishment of the encampment. Only registered student organizations in good standing or recognized bargaining units may request authorization for and take part in encampments under this subsection. An institution may authorize or deny the encampment request based on the time, place, or manner of the encampment in a content-neutral process to prevent disruption to education and other institutional activities. Any permitted encampment must serve an academic purpose.(3) If an individual or organization violates an institution of higher education's policies on encampments, a representative from the institution shall:(a) Direct the individual or organization to immediately dismantle the encampment and vacate the institution's campus;(b) Inform the individual or organization that any individual who fails to comply with the direction is guilty of criminal trespass;(c) Report the trespass to local law enforcement to begin legal action and have the individual or organization removed from the campus; and(d) Initiate disciplinary action against any student who refuses to comply with the direction to dismantle the encampment and vacate the campus according to the institution's student code of conduct.(4) A law enforcement agency, peace officer, or institutional campus security may remove an encampment and any individual or organization from the campus who has violated the prohibition on encampments and refuses to comply with the direction to leave described in this section, in accordance with local laws and ordinances.(5) An individual is liable for all damages caused by their unauthorized encampment, including the direct and indirect costs of:(a) Removing the encampment and restoring the campus; and(b) Repairing any destruction, defacement, or alteration of the institution's property that results from the individual's intentional or negligent conduct relating to the encampment.(6) Institutions of higher education shall adopt rules to implement this section.(7) For purposes of this section:(a) "Encampment" means a temporary shelter, including tents and outdoor encampments, that is installed on the campus of any institution of higher education; and(b) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.--- END ---